Illinois, session 104th, HB5384.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Currency Exchange Act is amended by 5changing Sections 16 and 19.3 as follows: 6    (205 ILCS 405/16)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4832)7    Sec. 16. Annual report; investigation; costs. 8    (a) Each licensee shall annually, on or before the 1st day 9of March, file a report with the Secretary for the calendar 10year period from January 1st through December 31st, giving 11such relevant information as the Secretary may reasonably 12require concerning, and for the purpose of examining, the 13business and operations during the preceding fiscal year 14period of each licensed currency exchange conducted by such 15licensee within the State. Such report shall be made under 16oath and shall be in the form prescribed by the Secretary. The 17Secretary may at any time, and shall at least once in each 18year, investigate the currency exchange business of any 19licensee and of every person, partnership, association, 20limited liability company, and corporation who or which shall 21be engaged in the business of operating a currency exchange. 22For that purpose, the Secretary shall have free access to the 23offices and places of business and to such records of all such   HB5384 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 20479 BAB 33949 b1persons, firms, partnerships, associations, limited liability 2companies and members thereof, and corporations and to the 3officers and directors thereof that shall relate to such 4currency exchange business. The investigation may be conducted 5in conjunction with representatives of other State agencies or 6agencies of another state or of the United States as 7determined by the Secretary. The Secretary may at any time 8inspect the locations served by an ambulatory currency 9exchange, for the purpose of determining whether such currency 10exchange is complying with the provisions of this Act at each 11location served. The Secretary may require by subpoena the 12attendance of and examine under oath all persons whose 13testimony he may require relative to such business, and in 14such cases the Secretary, or any qualified representative of 15the Secretary whom the Secretary may designate, may administer 16oaths to all such persons called as witnesses, and the 17Secretary, or any such qualified representative of the 18Secretary, may conduct such examinations, and there shall be 19paid to the Secretary for each such examination a fee of $250 20for each day or part thereof for each qualified representative 21designated and required to conduct the examination; provided, 22however, that in the case of an ambulatory currency exchange, 23such fee shall be $150 for each day or part thereof.24    (b) Confidentiality. All information collected by the 25Department in the course of an examination or investigation of 26an ambulatory or community currency exchange or applicant,   HB5384 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 20479 BAB 33949 b1including, by not limited to, any complaint against an 2ambulatory or community currency exchange filed with the 3Department, and information collected to investigate any such 4complaint shall be maintained for the confidential use of the 5Department and shall not be disclosed. The Department may not 6disclose such information to anyone other than law enforcement 7officials, other regulatory agencies that have an appropriate 8regulatory interest as determined by the Secretary, or to a 9party presenting a lawful subpoena to the Department. 10Information and documents disclosed to a federal, State, 11county, or local law enforcement agency shall not be disclosed 12by the agency for any purpose to any other agency or person. A 13formal complaint filed against a licensee by the Department or 14any order issued by the Department against a licensee shall be 15a public record, except as otherwise prohibited by law. 16(Source: P.A. 97-315, eff. 1-1-12.) 17    (205 ILCS 405/19.3)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4838)18    Sec. 19.3. (A) The General Assembly hereby finds and 19declares: community currency exchanges and ambulatory currency 20exchanges provide important and vital services to Illinois 21citizens. In so doing, they transact extensive business 22involving check cashing and the writing of money orders in 23communities in which banking services are generally 24unavailable. Customers of currency exchanges who receive these 25services must be protected from being charged unreasonable and   HB5384 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 20479 BAB 33949 b1unconscionable rates for cashing checks and purchasing money 2orders. The Illinois Department of Financial and Professional 3Regulation has the responsibility for regulating the 4operations of currency exchanges and has the expertise to 5determine reasonable maximum rates to be charged for check 6cashing and money order purchases. Therefore, it is in the 7public interest, convenience, welfare and good to have the 8Department establish reasonable maximum rate schedules for 9check cashing and the issuance of money orders and to require 10community and ambulatory currency exchanges to prominently 11display to the public the fees charged for all services. The 12Secretary shall review, each year, the cost of operation of 13the Currency Exchange Section and the revenue generated from 14currency exchange examinations and report to the General 15Assembly if the need exists for an increase in the fees 16mandated by this Act to maintain the Currency Exchange Section 17at a fiscally self-sufficient level. The Secretary shall 18include in such report the total amount of funds remitted to 19the State and delivered to the State Treasurer by currency 20exchanges pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property 21Act.22    (B) The expenses of administering this Act, including 23licensing, investigations, and examinations provided for in 24this Act, shall be borne by and assessed against persons and 25entities regulated by this Act in such proportions and in such 26manner as the Secretary deems appropriate. The Secretary may   HB5384 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 20479 BAB 33949 b1establish by rule the category and amount of any fees that the 2persons and entities must pay to the Department.3    (C) Any fees set forth in this Act may be amended by rule. 4    (D) (B) The Secretary shall, by rules adopted in 5accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 6expeditiously formulate and issue schedules of reasonable 7maximum rates which can be charged for check cashing and 8writing of money orders by community currency exchanges and 9ambulatory currency exchanges.10        (1) In determining the maximum rate schedules for the 11    purposes of this Section the Secretary shall take into 12    account:13            (a) Rates charged in the past for the cashing of 14        checks and the issuance of money orders by community 15        and ambulatory currency exchanges.16            (b) Rates charged by banks or other business 17        entities for rendering the same or similar services 18        and the factors upon which those rates are based.19            (c) The income, cost and expense of the operation 20        of currency exchanges.21            (d) Rates charged by currency exchanges or other 22        similar entities located in other states for the same 23        or similar services and the factors upon which those 24        rates are based.25            (e) Rates charged by the United States Postal 26        Service for the issuing of money orders and the   HB5384 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 20479 BAB 33949 b1        factors upon which those rates are based.2            (f) A reasonable profit for a currency exchange 3        operation.4            (g) The impact on consumers.5            (h) Whether the rate schedule will 6        disproportionately impact anyone on the basis of any 7        protected characteristic or category listed in 8        subsection (Q) of Section 1-103 of the Illinois Human 9        Rights Act as those terms are defined in that Section. 10        (2)(a) The schedule of reasonable maximum rates 11    established pursuant to this Section may be modified by 12    the Secretary from time to time pursuant to rules adopted 13    in accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure 14    Act.15        (b) Upon the filing of a verified petition setting 16    forth allegations demonstrating reasonable cause to 17    believe that the schedule of maximum rates previously 18    issued and promulgated should be adjusted, the Secretary 19    shall expeditiously:20            (i) reject the petition if it fails to demonstrate 21        reasonable cause to believe that an adjustment is 22        necessary; or23            (ii) conduct such hearings, in accordance with 24        this Section, as may be necessary to determine whether 25        the petition should be granted in whole or in part.26        (c) No petition may be filed pursuant to subparagraph   HB5384 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 20479 BAB 33949 b1    (a) of paragraph (2) of subsection (B) unless:2            (i) at least nine months have expired since the 3        last promulgation of schedules of maximum rates; and4            (ii) at least one-fourth of all community currency 5        exchange licensees join in a petition or, in the case 6        of ambulatory currency exchanges, a licensee or 7        licensees authorized to serve at least 100 locations 8        join in a petition.9        (3) Any currency exchange may charge lower fees than 10    those of the applicable maximum fee schedule after filing 11    with the Secretary a schedule of fees it proposes to use.12(Source: P.A. 100-22, eff. 1-1-18; 100-704, eff. 6-1-19.) 13    Section 10. The Sales Finance Agency Act is amended by 14changing Section 7 and by adding Sections 6.2 and 6.3 as 15follows: 16    (205 ILCS 660/6.2 new)17    Sec. 6.2. Fees. 18    (a) The expenses of administering this Act, including 19licensing, investigations, and examinations provided for in 20this Act, shall be borne by and assessed against persons and 21entities regulated by this Act in such proportions and in such 22manner as the Secretary of Financial and Professional 23Regulation deems appropriate. The Secretary may establish by 24rule the category and amount of any fees that the persons and   HB5384 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 20479 BAB 33949 b1entities must pay to the Department.2    (b) Any fees set forth in this Act may be amended by rule. 3    (205 ILCS 660/6.3 new)4    Sec. 6.3. Annual meeting between the sales finance 5industry and the Department. The Department shall, if 6requested to do so by at least 20 interested persons currently 7licensed under this Act or an association representing at 8least 20 interested persons currently licensed under this Act, 9meet at least once per calendar year with representatives of 10the sales finance industry to discuss industry developments, 11fees, anticipated rules, or issues confronting the Department 12in its regulation and discipline of the industry. 13    (205 ILCS 660/7)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5207)14    Sec. 7. The Department may shall examine each licensee at 15any time annually to determine if the licensee it is in 16compliance with this Act. The expense of this annual 17examination shall be paid to the Department by the licensee in 18accordance with a schedule of fees established by the 19Department as reasonably reflecting the actual cost of the 20examination.21    In addition, the Department may charge all licensees in 22accordance with its schedule of fees for the examinations or 23re-examinations made pursuant to Section 11 of this Act. This 24expense and cost of examination is in addition to the license   HB5384 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 20479 BAB 33949 b1fees.2(Source: P.A. 90-437, eff. 1-1-98.) 3    Section 15. The Debt Management Service Act is amended by 4adding Section 6.5 as follows: 5    (205 ILCS 665/6.5 new)6    Sec. 6.5. Fees. 7    (a) The expenses of administering this Act, including 8licensing, investigations, and examinations provided for in 9this Act, shall be borne by and assessed against persons and 10entities regulated by this Act in such proportions and in such 11manner as the Secretary deems appropriate. The Secretary may 12establish by rule the category and amount of any fees that the 13persons and entities must pay to the Department.14    (b) Any fees set forth in this Act may be amended by rule. 15    Section 20. The Consumer Installment Loan Act is amended 16by changing Sections 2 and 10 and by adding Sections 2.5 and 172.6 as follows: 18    (205 ILCS 670/2)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5402)19    Sec. 2. Application; fees; positive net worth. Application 20for such license shall be in writing, and in the form 21prescribed by the Director. Such applicant at the time of 22making such application shall pay to the Director the sum of   HB5384 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 20479 BAB 33949 b1$300 as an application fee and the additional sum of $450 as an 2annual license fee, for a period terminating on the last day of 3the current calendar year; provided that if the application is 4filed after June 30th in any year, such license fee shall be 51/2 of the annual license fee for such year.6    Before the license is granted, every applicant shall prove 7in form satisfactory to the Director that the applicant has 8and will maintain a positive net worth of a minimum of $30,000. 9Every applicant and licensee shall maintain a surety bond in 10the principal sum of $25,000 issued by a bonding company 11authorized to do business in this State and which shall be 12approved by the Director. Such bond shall run to the Director 13and shall be for the benefit of any consumer who incurs damages 14as a result of any violation of the Act or rules by a licensee. 15If the Director finds at any time that a bond is of 16insufficient size, is insecure, exhausted, or otherwise 17doubtful, an additional bond in such amount as determined by 18the Director shall be filed by the licensee within 30 days 19after written demand therefor by the Director. "Net worth" 20means total assets minus total liabilities.21(Source: P.A. 92-398, eff. 1-1-02; 93-32, eff. 7-1-03.) 22    (205 ILCS 670/2.5 new)23    Sec. 2.5. Fees. 24    (a) The expenses of administering this Act, including 25licensing, investigations, and examinations provided for in   HB5384 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 20479 BAB 33949 b1this Act, shall be borne by and assessed against persons and 2entities regulated by this Act in such proportions and in such 3manner as the Secretary of Financial and Professional 4Regulation deems appropriate. The Secretary may establish by 5rule the category and amount of any fees that the persons and 6entities must pay to the Department of Financial and 7Professional Regulation.8    (b) Any fees set forth in this Act may be amended by rule. 9    (205 ILCS 670/2.6 new)10    Sec. 2.6. Annual meeting between the consumer installment 11lending industry and the Department. The Department shall, if 12requested to do so by at least 20 interested persons currently 13licensed under this Act or an association representing at 14least 20 interested persons currently licensed under this Act, 15meet at least once per calendar year with representatives of 16the consumer installment lending industry to discuss industry 17developments, fees, anticipated rules, or issues confronting 18the Department in its regulation and discipline of the 19industry. 20    (205 ILCS 670/10)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5410)21    Sec. 10. Investigation of conduct of business. For the 22purpose of discovering violations of this Act or securing 23information lawfully required by it, the Director may at any 24time investigate the loans and business and examine the books,   HB5384 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 20479 BAB 33949 b1accounts, records, and files used therein, of every licensee 2and of every person, partnership, association, limited 3liability company, and corporation engaged in the business 4described in Section 1 of this Act, whether such person, 5partnership, association, limited liability company, or 6corporation shall act or claim to act as principal or agent or 7within or without the authority of this Act. For such purpose 8the Director shall have free access to the offices and places 9of business, books, accounts, papers, records, files, safes, 10and vaults of such persons, partnerships, associations, 11limited liability companies, and corporations. The Director 12may require the attendance of and examine under oath all 13persons whose testimony he or she may require relative to such 14loans or such business, and in such cases the Director shall 15have power to administer oaths to all persons called as 16witnesses; and the Director may conduct such examinations.17    The Director may shall make an examination of the affairs, 18business, office, and records of each licensee at any time to 19determine if the licensee is in compliance with the Act at 20least once each year. The Director may shall by rule and 21regulation set the fee to be charged for each examination day, 22including travel expenses for out-of-state licensed locations. 23The fee shall reasonably reflect actual costs. The Director 24shall also have authority to examine the books and records of 25any business made by a former licensee which is being 26liquidated, as the Director deems necessary, and may charge   HB5384 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 20479 BAB 33949 b1the examination fees otherwise required for licensees.2(Source: P.A. 90-437, eff. 1-1-98.) 3    Section 25. The Debt Settlement Consumer Protection Act is 4amended by adding Section 78 as follows: 5    (225 ILCS 429/78 new)6    Sec. 78. Fees. 7    (a) The expenses of administering this Act, including 8licensing, investigations, and examinations provided for in 9this Act, shall be borne by and assessed against persons and 10entities regulated by this Act in such proportions and in such 11manner as the Secretary deems appropriate. The Secretary may 12establish by rule the category and amount of any fees that the 13persons and entities must pay to the Department.14    (b) Any fees set forth in this Act may be amended by rule. 15    Section 30. The Safety Deposit License Act is amended by 16changing Section 23 and by adding Section 23.5 as follows: 17    (240 ILCS 5/23)  (from Ch. 17, par. 1473)18    Sec. 23. The Director, by his agents, may shall inspect at 19least once in each license period, the license, safety deposit 20boxes, safes, vault or other facilities furnished by the 21licensee at any time.22    If the Director finds that the licensee is not complying   HB5384 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 20479 BAB 33949 b1with the provisions of this Act he may revoke the license of 2the licensee, and the licensee shall not be eligible for a 3license hereunder for a period of six months following the 4date of revocation.5    The Director shall keep in his office a permanent record 6of all inspections made, and such record shall be available to 7the public.8(Source: Laws 1967, p. 1668.) 9    (240 ILCS 5/23.5 new)10    Sec. 23.5. Fees. 11    (a) The expenses of administering this Act, including 12licensing, investigations, and examinations provided for in 13this Act, shall be borne by and assessed against persons and 14entities regulated by this Act in such proportions and in such 15manner as the Secretary of Financial and Professional 16Regulation deems appropriate. The Secretary may establish by 17rule the category and amount of any fees that the persons and 18entities must pay to the Secretary.19    (b) Any fees set forth in this Act may be amended by rule. 20    Section 35. The Payday Loan Reform Act is amended by 21adding Section 3-6 as follows: 22    (815 ILCS 122/3-6 new)23    Sec. 3-6. Fees.   HB5384 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 20479 BAB 33949 b1    (a) The expenses of administering this Act, including 2licensing, investigations, and examinations provided for in 3this Act, shall be borne by and assessed against persons and 4entities regulated by this Act in such proportions and in such 5manner as the Secretary deems appropriate. The Secretary may 6establish by rule the category and amount of any fees that the 7persons and entities must pay to the Department.8    (b) Any fees set forth in this Act may be amended by rule. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.